Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAKE COUNTY VETERANS MEMORIAL PARK.new text end new text begin $40,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to Lake County to plan a veterans memorial park that recognizes and honors veterans and Minnesota history. new text end